Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-113
Office and agent for service of process.

(RULLCA 113) (a) A limited
liability company shall designate and continuously maintain in this state:

(1) an office, which
need not be a place of its activity in this state; and

(2) an agent for service
of process.

(b)
A foreign limited liability company that has a certificate of authority under
section 21-156 shall designate and continuously maintain in this state an
agent for service of process.

(c) An agent for service of process of a limited liability
company or foreign limited liability company must be an individual who is
a resident of this state or other person with authority to transact business
in this state.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 13.